Utah statutes.
31A-17-203.   Encumbering of assets.
(1)  No domestic insurer may pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber its
assets to secure the debt, guaranty, or obligation of any other person. This
prohibition does not apply to obligations of the insurer under surety bonds or
insurance contracts issued in the regular course of business.
(2)  No domestic insurer may pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber its
assets in an amount in excess of the amount of its capital and surplus,
without the prior written consent of the commissioner.
(3)  The commissioner may grant a domestic insurer an exception to Subsection
(2) for a reinsurance agreement which may cause assets of the domestic insurer
to be held, deposited, pledged, hypothecated, or otherwise encumbered in an
amount in excess of capital and surplus to secure, offset, protect, or meet
reserves or liabilities of the insurer that are established, incurred, or
required under the provisions of the reinsurance agreement.  The domestic
insurer shall first file with the commissioner a written request for this
exception, accompanied by a copy of the proposed reinsurance agreement and
specifically stating its purpose and the reasons the exception should be
granted.
(4)  Any person that accepts a pledge, hypothecation, or encumbrance of any
asset of an insurer not in accordance with the terms and limitations of this
section is considered to have accepted that asset subject to a superior,
preferential, and perfected lien in favor of owners, beneficiaries, assignees,
certificate holders, or third party claimants or beneficiaries of any
insurance benefit or right arising out of and within the coverage of any
insurance policy issued by the insurer.  The commissioner may bring or
participate in an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to protect the
interests of insureds or claimants under this section.
